California, session 20252026, AB449.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12931.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:12931.5. (a) Commencing on or before the later of either July 1, 2026, or one year after the date of the appropriation described in subdivision (d), the department shall create and implement statewide and regional radio, social media, and television campaigns to discourage discrimination based upon, but not limited to, disability, gender, nationality, race or ethnicity, religion, or sexual orientation.(b) (1) The department shall convene a working group to develop a plan to implement this section, the members of which shall be appointed as follows:(A) Nine members appointed by the director of the department with expertise in the field of marketing and messaging, specifically on topics germane to this section, who shall reflect the geographic and demographic diversity of the state.(B) One member of the Assembly, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.(C) One member of the Senate, appointed by the President pro Tempore of the Senate.(2) The working group described in this subdivision is not subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1).(c) The percentage of advertisements focused on combating hate violence against a specific community with a common protected characteristic that are created and distributed shall be based on the rate of hate crimes committed against each community with a common protected characteristic as determined by the most recent Hate Crime in California report released by the Attorney General or other reliable and more accurate data on hate violence.(d) This section shall not become operative until funding and positions are appropriated by the Legislature in the Budget Act or any other measure for the purposes of this section. The department shall send notice of the appropriation to the Secretary of State, the Business, Consumer Services, and Housing Agency, and the Legislative Counsel Bureau.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1 of this act, which adds Section 12931.5 to the Government Code, imposes a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:In order to ensure diverse and expert input in the creation of antidiscrimination media campaigns, it is necessary for the working group created by this act to be exempted from the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act.